Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1821
Real property taxes; tax receipt;
entries.

The treasurer shall make out a tax receipt for the taxes
on the real estate mentioned in the certificate, the same as in other cases,
and shall write thereon sold for taxes at public sale or sold for taxes at
private sale, as the case may be.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 209, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 6537;

C.S.1922, § 6065;

C.S.1929, § 77-2017;

R.S.1943, § 77-1821;

Laws 2012, LB851, § 5.